Utah statutes.
48-2c-1405.   No limitation on other changes.
The provisions of Sections 48-2c-1401 and 48-2c-1404 shall not be construed to
limit the accomplishment of a change in the law governing, or the domicile of,
any entity to this state by any other means provided for in an operating
agreement or other agreement or as otherwise permitted by law.
